Illinois, session 104th, HB3551.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by adding Section 65.135 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/65.135 new)7    Sec. 65.135. Adult Learner Flexible Education Grant 8Program.9    (a) In this Section: 10    "Qualified institution" means either a qualified 11institution as defined in Section 10 of this Act or a 12not-for-profit postsecondary institution that is accredited by 13a regional accrediting organization recognized by the Board of 14Higher Education or the United States Department of Education 15and that meets all of the following criteria:16        (1) The institution was originally chartered and is 17    currently operating as a not-for-profit entity.18        (2) The institution offers classes exclusively online.19        (3) The institution's 3-year federal student loan 20    cohort default rate, as published by the United States 21    Department of Education, does not exceed 10%.22        (4) The institution has at least 100,000 enrolled 23    full-time students.  HB3551- 2 -LRB104 11479 LNS 21568 b1        (5) The institution's 3-year average cost of tuition 2    and mandatory fees is less than the 3-year average cost of 3    tuition and mandatory fees at public universities in this 4    State, based on data published by the United States 5    Department of Education.6        (6) The institution participates in the Federal Pell 7    Grant Program and in at least 2 of the following federal 8    student aid programs:9            (A) The Federal Work-Study Program.10            (B) The William D. Ford Federal Direct Loan 11        Program.12            (C) The Federal Supplemental Educational 13        Opportunity Grant Program.14    "Tuition and mandatory fees" means the customary charge 15for instruction and the additional fixed fees charged for 16specified purposes that are required generally of nongrant 17students for each academic period for which a grant recipient 18enrolls. The Commission may adopt rules concerning the 19computation of tuition and mandatory fees for the purposes of 20this definition.21    (b) The Commission shall establish the Adult Learner 22Flexible Education Grant Program to facilitate access to 23online postsecondary education for adults over the age of 25 24pursuing careers in fields facing workforce shortages, as 25determined by the Commission.26    (c) Beginning with the 2025-2026 academic year, subject to   HB3551- 3 -LRB104 11479 LNS 21568 b1appropriation, the Commission shall receive and consider 2applications for grant assistance under this Section. An 3applicant is eligible for a grant under this Section if the 4Commission finds that the applicant meets all of the following 5qualifications:6        (1) The applicant is over the age of 25.7        (2) The applicant is pursuing a fully online degree or 8    certificate in a field with a demonstrated workforce 9    shortage, as determined by the Commission.10        (3) The applicant is a resident of this State and a 11    permanent resident of the United States.12        (4) The applicant is enrolled or accepted for 13    enrollment at a qualified institution.14        (5) The applicant has completed the Free Application 15    for Federal Student Aid.16        (6) The applicant can identify the specific 17    certificate, credential, or degree that he or she is 18    seeking to obtain.19        (7) The applicant, in the absence of grant assistance, 20    will be deterred by financial considerations from 21    completing an educational program at the qualified 22    institution of the applicant's choice.23        (8) The applicant has not already received a 24    baccalaureate degree.25    (d) All grants under this Section are applicable only to 26tuition and mandatory fees. The Commission shall determine the   HB3551- 4 -LRB104 11479 LNS 21568 b1grant amount for each student, which amount must not exceed 2$5,000. The total amount of a grant awarded by the Commission 3under this Section to an individual in any given fiscal year, 4when added to other financial assistance awarded to that 5individual for that fiscal year, may not exceed the cost of 6attendance at the qualified institution at which the 7individual is enrolled.8    (e) All applications for grants to be awarded under this 9Section shall be made to the Commission in a form as set forth 10by the Commission. The form of application and the information 11required to be set forth in the application shall be 12determined by the Commission. The Commission shall require 13eligible applicants to submit with their applications such 14supporting documents, including financial documents, as the 15Commission deems necessary.16    (f) All grant funds distributed in accordance with this 17Section shall be paid to the qualified institution on behalf 18of the recipient. Grants are applicable toward 2 semesters or 19equivalent academic terms of enrollment within an academic 20year. Up to 3% of the appropriation for this program may be 21used by the Commission for the costs of administering the 22program. The Commission may establish a methodology for the 23distribution of grants, prioritizing all of the following:24        (1) Students who demonstrate the most financial need.25        (2) First-generation students.26        (3) Minority students.  HB3551- 5 -LRB104 11479 LNS 21568 b1        (4) Students residing in rural areas.2    (g) The Commission shall adopt all necessary and proper 3rules not inconsistent with this Section for its effective 4implementation. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62025.